test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ruavast_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - ruávást: # 1B d-k,  v-´v
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruávástân        # ruá´vástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruávástist       # ruá´vástist 
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruávástáin       # ruá´vástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruávásttáá       #
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruávástin           # ruá´vástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruávástid           # ruá´vástid 
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruávásteh        # ruá´vásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruávástij        # ruá´vástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruávástijd       # ruá´vástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruávástáid       # ruá´vástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruávástijn       # ruá´vástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruávástijguin    # ruá´vástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruávástijttáá    # ruá´vástijttáá
